Missouri, session 2026, HB3535.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 320.230, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 320.230, to read as follows:
320.230. 1. The state fire marshal shall conduct investigations and may conduct
hearings into the cause, origin, or circumstances of fire losses and shall cooperate with the
appropriate fire or police officials of this state or its political subdivisions in investigations of
the cause, origin or circumstances of fires, explosions or related occurrences involving the
possibility of arson or related offenses.
2. The state fire marshal and the marshal's paid investigators who have attained
proper certification as peace officers pursuant to chapter 590 as approved by the director of
the department of public safety shall be deemed to be peace officers and shall notify the local
law enforcement agency of the existence of the investigators and shall have the power of
arrest for all offenses incident to the investigation of the cause, origin or circumstances of
fires, fireworks, explosions or like occurrences involving the possibility of arson, or related
offenses, and in connection with any offenses when aiding and assisting the sheriff of any
county or the chief of police of any municipality, or their designated representatives, at their
request, or when exigent circumstances that present an immediate threat of bodily harm
to any person exist.
3. The term "fireworks" shall be as defined in section 320.106.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.